Arkansas, session 2025, SB290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-309(f), concerning authorization for a
committee or subcommittee to vote to not approve a rule under the section, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5) A committee or subcommittee under this section considering a
rule to institute a moratorium in a watershed or other body of water under §
15-23-107 is not required to state the grounds under subdivision (f)(1) of
this section when not approving a rule.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 23, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-23-107. Prohibition on moratorium in watersheds and other bodies of
water — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "moratorium" means a prohibition on the
issuance of permits or any other limitation on agricultural production,
including without limitation, livestock and poultry operations, contained
animal feeding operations, and the cultivation of crops and orchards.
*CRH168*
04-14-2025 09:17:38 CRH168

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/2/25 H4/14/25 SB290
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (f) of this section, a
state agency, including without limitation the Department of Agriculture and
the Department of Energy and Environment, shall not institute a moratorium on
the issuance of permits in a watershed or other body of water.
(c)(1) In order for a state agency to institute a moratorium related
to a watershed or other body of water, the state agency shall:
(A) Promulgate a rule to institute the moratorium;
(B)(i) Follow the procedure under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(ii) If the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq., does not apply to the state agency, the state agency shall
follow the law governing the adequate administrative procedures for the state
agency; and
(C) Obtain review and approval of the state agency rule
under § 10-3-309.
(2)(A) A moratorium reviewed and approved under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall expire four (4) years after the effective date
of the rule.
(B) A state agency that wishes to continue a moratorium
shall submit the moratorium to the Legislative Council, or if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, for review and approval
sufficiently in advance of the expiration date described under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section to continue the moratorium.
(C) If the state agency fails to submit a moratorium to
the Legislative Council, or if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, for review and approval prior to the expiration date or if
the Legislative Council, or if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, does not approve the moratorium, the moratorium shall
expire at the expiration date.
(d) This section does not prohibit a state agency from seeking review
and approval for a proposed emergency rule under § 10-3-309 and § 25-15-204
to impose a moratorium to protect the public from imminent peril to the
public health, safety, or welfare or compliance with a federal law or
regulation.
(e) If a state agency does not have statutory authority to impose a
moratorium, this section does not create the authority for a moratorium.
04-14-2025 09:17:38 CRH168

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/2/25 H4/14/25 SB290
(f) This section does not apply to a moratorium related to a watershed
or other body of water instituted by rule before the effective date of this
section.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Existing rule.
The Department of Agriculture shall utilize the current Arkansas
Pollution Control and Ecology Commission's rules on Liquid Animal Waste
Management Systems, 8 CAR pt. 24, formerly known as Regulation No. 5, to
administer the department's authority over liquid animal waste management
systems under § 15-20-102 until the department adopts final rules regarding
liquid animal waste management systems.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act shall be effective on and after February 1, 2026.

/s/B. Johnson




















04-14-2025 09:17:38 CRH168